New Jersey, session 221, A1427.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): On-demand micro transit means publicly available, technology-enabled, shared transportation provided by means of a motor vehicle to individuals selecting a pick-up and drop-off location by telephone or through a mobile application, and which transportation is provided at a time selected by the individual or as soon as possible after the individual selects pick-up and drop-off locations for such transportation. On-demand micro transit pilot program or pilot program means any on-demand micro transit pilot program operated in the State by the New Jersey Transit Corporation, a county transit agency, or any other entity. Transit desert means a municipality, or physically contiguous area in the State, in which, as of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this act), residents have limited access to public transportation services, including motorbus regular route service, rail passenger service, and light-rail passenger service. 2.  The New Jersey Transit Corporation, in consultation with the Commissioner of Transportation, shall establish and issue guidelines for the operation of any on-demand micro transit pilot program within the State. These guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, recommendations to: a.  incentivize the preferential employment of drivers and other employees who are represented in collective bargaining with the operator of the on-demand micro transit pilot program by an employee organization designated by a majority of the employees, notwithstanding any provisions of section 6 of P.L.1968, c.303 (C.34:13A-5.3) to the contrary, which incentives shall not prohibit the operator of the pilot program from outsourcing technology services to one or more third-parties as necessary for the operation of the pilot program; b.  ensure that each pilot program is affordable to individuals, especially those residing in transit deserts; c.  specify the classifications of motor vehicles that may be used in the operation of the pilot programs, which classifications may include, but shall not be limited to, those motor vehicles for which a driver is required to obtain a commercial driver license; and d.  implement any other incentives, protocols, or requirements that the corporation or the commissioner deem necessary. 3.  The New Jersey Transit Corporation shall prioritize the continued creation of on-demand micro transit service to areas with dense populations, a lack of current transportation services, and those in need of bridge service to connect transit dependent populations to the regional rail network. The corporation shall focus specifically on Bergen, Mercer, and Middlesex counties as the corporation continues to expand pilot program services. 4.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month after enactment.